Washington statutes.
RCW 18.280.050

Director's authority.

The director has the following authority in administering this chapter:

(1) To adopt, amend, and rescind rules approved by the board as deemed necessary to carry out this chapter;

(2) To administer licensing examinations approved by the board and to adopt or recognize examinations prepared by other entities as approved by the board;

(3) To adopt standards of professional conduct, practice, and ethics as approved by the board; and

(4) To adopt fees as provided in RCW 43.24.086.

[ 2008 c 119 s 5.]